Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 34.08.710.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter the provisions of this chapter may not be varied by agreement and rights conferred by this chapter may not be waived.
A declarant may not act under a power of attorney or use any other device to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this chapter or a declaration recorded under it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.720.
Separate titles and taxation.

In a cooperative, the interest of a unit owner in a unit and its allocated interests is real estate for all purposes, except that the real estate constituting the cooperative shall be assessed and taxed as a whole and the interest of a unit owner may not be separately taxed.

In a condominium or planned community,

if there is a unit owner other than a declarant, each unit that has been created, together with its interest in the common elements, constitutes for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate;

if there is a unit owner other than a declarant, each unit shall be separately taxed and assessed, and a separate tax or assessment may not be rendered against any common elements for which a declarant has reserved no development rights.

Any portion of the common elements for which the declarant has reserved a development right shall be separately taxed and assessed against the declarant and the declarant alone is liable for payment of the taxes.

If there is no unit owner other than a declarant, the real estate comprising the common interest community may be taxed and assessed in any manner provided by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.730.
Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A building code may not impose a requirement upon a structure in a common interest community that the building code would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership.

A zoning, subdivision, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation may not prohibit the condominium or cooperative form of ownership or impose a requirement upon a condominium or cooperative that it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership.

Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this section, the provisions of this chapter do not invalidate or modify a provision of a building code, zoning, subdivision, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation governing the use of real estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.740.
Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain or part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a remnant that may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted by the declaration, the award must include compensation to the unit owner for that unit and its allocated interests, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides, the allocated interests of the unit are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations, and file and record a plat or plan that accompanies the amendment. A remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection is a common element from that time.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award must compensate the unit owner for the reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree provides otherwise,

the allocated interests of the unit are reduced either in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit or on the basis specified in the declaration; and

the portion of the allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit are automatically reallocated to the unit and to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of the units before the taking, with the partially-acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, the portion of the award attributable to the common elements taken must be paid to the association. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any portion of the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element must be equally divided among the owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition.

The court decree must be recorded in each recording district in which any portion of the common interest community is located.

On a condemnation of a unit or common area, an award or decree must include a reasonable amount to cover the cost of reallocating the allocatable interests of the unit owners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 26 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.08.750.
Supplemental general principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the law of real property, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this chapter except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.760.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This chapter is a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter and a part of the chapter may not be construed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.770.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the chapter among states enacting it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.780.
Severability.

If a provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.790.
Unconscionable agreement or term of contract.

Upon finding as a matter of law that a contract or contract clause was unconscionable at the time the contract was made, a court may refuse to enforce the contract, may enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or may limit the application of the unconscionable clause in order to avoid an unconscionable result.

Whenever it is claimed or appears to the court that a contract or a contract clause is or may be unconscionable, the parties, in order to aid the court in making the determination, must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to (1) the commercial setting of the negotiations; (2) whether a party has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of another party reasonably to protect personal interests by reason of physical or mental infirmity, illiteracy, inability to understand the language of the agreement, or similar factors; (3) the effect and purpose of the contract or clause; and (4) any gross disparity, if a sale, at the time of contracting, between the amount charged for the property and the value of the property measured by the price at which similar property was readily obtainable in similar transactions. A disparity between the contract price and the value of the property measured by the price at which similar property was readily obtainable in similar transactions does not, of itself, render the contract unconscionable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.800.
Obligation of good faith.

A contract or duty governed by this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.810.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by this chapter shall be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed. Consequential, special, or punitive damages may not be awarded except as specifically provided in this chapter or by other rule of law.

A right or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.820.
Adjustment of dollar amounts.

The dollar amounts specified in AS

34.08.030

and

34.08.510(b)(7)

change under (b) and (c) of this section, according to and to the extent of changes in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers: U.S. City Average, All Items 1967 equal 100, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor, (the “Index”). The Index for December, 1979, which was 230, is the Reference Base Index.

The dollar amounts specified in AS

34.08.030

and

34.08.510(b)(7)

and any amount stated in the declaration pursuant to those sections change on July 1 of each year if the percentage of change, calculated to the nearest whole percentage point, between the Index at the end of the preceding year and the Reference Base Index is 10 percent or more, except that

the portion of the percentage change in the Index in excess of a multiple of 10 percent shall be disregarded and the dollar amounts shall change only in multiples of 10 percent of the amounts appearing in this chapter on January 1, 1986;

the dollar amounts may not change if the amounts required by this section are those currently in effect under this chapter as a result of an earlier application of this section; and

in no event may the dollar amounts be reduced below the amounts appearing in this chapter on January 1, 1986.

If the Index is revised after December 1979, the percentage of change under this section shall be calculated on the basis of the revised Index. If the revision of the Index changes the Reference Base Index, a revised Reference Base Index must be determined by multiplying the Reference Base Index then applicable by the rebasing factor furnished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the Index is superseded, the index referred to in this section is the one represented by the Bureau of Labor Statistics as reflecting most accurately changes in the purchasing power of the dollar for consumers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.830.
Transfer of unit in a cooperative.

If a unit in a cooperative is owned by a unit owner or is sold, conveyed, voluntarily or involuntarily encumbered, or otherwise transferred by the unit owner, the interest in the unit that is owned, sold, conveyed, encumbered, or otherwise transferred is the right to possession of the unit under a proprietary lease, coupled with the allocated interests of the unit, and the association’s interest in the unit is not affected by the transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affiliate of a declarant”

means a person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant;

as used in this paragraph, a person “controls” a declarant if the person

is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the declarant;

directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the declarant;

controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant; or

has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the declarant;

as used in this paragraph, a person “is controlled by” a declarant if the declarant

is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person;

directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the person;

controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or

has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the person;

as used in this paragraph, “control” does not exist if the powers described in this paragraph are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised;

“allocated interests” means the following interests allocated to each unit:

in a condominium, the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association;

in a cooperative, the common expense liability and the ownership interest and votes in the association; and

in a planned community, the common expense liability and votes in the association;

“association” or “unit owners’ association” means the unit owners’ association organized under AS

34.08.310

;

“common elements” means

in a condominium or cooperative, each portion of the common interest community other than a unit; and

in a planned community, the real estate within a planned community owned or leased by the association, other than a unit;

“common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit under AS

34.08.150

;

“common expenses” means expenditures made by, or financial liabilities of, the association, together with any allocations to reserves;

“common interest community” means real estate with respect to which a person, by virtue of ownership of a unit, is obligated to pay for real estate taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance, or improvement of other real estate described in a declaration;

“condominium” means a common interest community in which

portions of the real estate are designated for separate ownership;

the remainder of the real estate is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions; and

the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners;

“conversion property” means real estate that before creation of the common interest community, was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers and persons who occupy with the consent of purchasers;

“cooperative” means a common interest community in which the real estate is owned by an association, each of whose members is entitled by virtue of an ownership interest in the association to exclusive possession of a unit;

“dealer” means a person who owns either six or more units in a common interest community or 50 percent or more of the units in a common interest community;

“declarant” means a person or a group of persons acting in concert who

as part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of its interest in a unit not previously disposed of; or

reserves or succeeds to a special declarant right;

“declaration”

means an instrument, however described, that creates a common interest community; and

includes amendments to a declaration;

“development right” means a right or a combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to

add real estate to a common interest community;

create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a common interest community;

subdivide units or convert units into common elements; or

withdraw real estate from a common interest community;

“dispose” or “disposition”

means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal or equitable interest in a unit;

does not include the transfer or release of a security interest;

“executive board” means the body designated in the declaration to act on behalf of the association;

“identifying number” means a symbol or address that identifies only one unit in a common interest community;

“leasehold common interest community” means a common interest community in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease that, on its expiration or termination, will terminate the common interest community or reduce its size;

“limited common element” means the portion of the common elements allocated for the exclusive use of one or more but fewer than all of the units by the declaration or by operation of AS

34.08.100

(2) or (4);

“master association” means an organization described in AS

34.08.280

whether or not it is also an association described in AS

34.08.310

;

“offering”

means an advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to encourage a person to acquire an interest in a unit, other than as security for an obligation;

does not include an advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical of general circulation, or in any other broadcast medium to the general public describing a common interest community not located in the state if the advertisement states that an offering may be made only in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the common interest community is located;

“ownership of a unit” does not include a leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than 40 years in a unit;

“person” means

an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, government subdivision or agency, or other legal or commercial entity;

in the case of a land trust, the beneficiary of the land trust and not the land trust or its trustee;

“planned community” means a common interest community that is not a condominium or a cooperative although a condominium or cooperative may be part of a planned community;

“proprietary lease” means the agreement with the association under which a member is entitled to exclusive possession of a unit in a cooperative;

“purchaser” means a person, other than a declarant or a dealer, who by means of a voluntary transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than

a leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than 40 years; or

as security for an obligation;

“real estate”

means a leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests that by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance;

includes parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water;

“residential purposes” means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both;

“security interest”

means an interest in real estate or personal property, created by contract or conveyance, that secures payment or performance of an obligation;

includes a lien created by a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security deed, contract for deed, land sales contract, lease intended as security, assignment of lease or rents intended as security, pledge of an ownership interest in an association, and any other consensual lien or title retention contract intended as security for an obligation;

“special declarant rights” means the right reserved for the benefit of a declarant to

complete improvements indicated on plats and plans filed and recorded with the declaration or, in a cooperative, to complete improvements described in the public offering statement under AS

34.08.530(a)(2)

;

exercise a development right;

maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the common interest community, and models;

use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the common interest community or within real estate that may be added to the common interest community;

make the common interest community subject to a master association;

merge or consolidate a common interest community with another common interest community of the same form of ownership; or

appoint or remove an officer of the association or a master association or an executive board member during a period of declarant control;

“time share” means a right to occupy a unit or any of several units during five or more separated time periods over a period of at least five years, including renewal options, whether or not coupled with an estate or interest in a common interest community or a specified portion of a common interest community;

“unit” means a physical portion of the common interest community designated for separate ownership or occupancy, the boundaries of which are described under AS

34.08.130(a)(5)

;

“unit owner”

means

a declarant;

a person who owns a unit;

a person who leases a unit in a leasehold common interest community whose lease expires simultaneously with any lease that on its expiration or termination will remove the unit from the common interest community;

does not include a person having an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation;

includes

in a condominium or planned community, the declarant as the owner of any unit created by the declaration;

in a cooperative, the declarant as the owner of any unit to which allocated interests have been allocated until that unit has been conveyed to another person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 27 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, paragraph (5) was renumbered as (6) and paragraph (6) was renumbered as (5) to maintain alphabetical order.

Sec. 34.08.995.
Short title.

This Act may be cited as the Uniform Common Interest Ownership Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)